Washington statutes.
RCW 39.44.200

State and local government bond information—Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 39.44.200 through 39.44.240.

(1) "Bond" means "bond" as defined in RCW 39.46.020, but also includes any other indebtedness that may be issued by any local government to fund private activities or purposes where the indebtedness is of a nonrecourse nature payable from private sources, including debt issued under chapter 39.50 RCW.

(2) "Local government" means "local government" as defined in RCW 39.46.020.

(3) "Type of bond" includes: (a) General obligation bonds, including councilmanic and voter-approved bonds; (b) revenue bonds; (c) local improvement district bonds; (d) special assessment bonds such as those issued by irrigation districts and diking districts; and (e) other classes of bonds.

(4) "State" means "state" as defined in RCW 39.46.020 but also includes any commissions or other entities of the state.

[ 2001 c 299 s 14; 1990 c 220 s 1; 1989 c 225 s 1; 1987 c 297 s 12; 1985 c 130 s 5.]